New Jersey, session 221, A790.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.    The title of P.L.2004, c.66 is amended to read as follows: An Act [imposing a "general purpose fee" on certain realty transfers and a fee upon grantees under certain deeds conveying residential property and] clarifying the law with respect to realty transfer fees generally, amending [and supplementing] P.L.1968, c.49, [and amending] P.L.1975, c.176 and P.L.1992, c.148. (cf: P.L.2004, c.66, title) 2.    Section 1 of P.L.1968, c.49 (C.46:15-5) is amended to read as follows: 1.    As used in this act: (a)   "Deed" means a written instrument entitled to be recorded in the office of a county recording officer which purports to convey or transfer title to a freehold interest in any lands, tenements or other realty in this State by way of grant or bargain and sale thereof from the named grantor to the named grantee.  A leasehold interest for 99 years or more or a proprietary lease of a cooperative unit and any assignment of a proprietary lease of a cooperative unit, shall be treated as a "freehold" for the purpose of this act.  Instruments providing for common driveways, for exchanges of easements or rights-of-way, for revocable licenses to use, to adjust or to clear defects of or clouds on title, to provide for utility service lines such as drainage, sewerage, water, electric, telephone or other such service lines, or to quitclaim possible outstanding interests, shall not be "deeds" for the purposes of this act. (b)  The terms "county recording officer" and "office of the county recording officer" mean the register of deeds and mortgages in counties having such an officer and office, and the county clerk and his office in the other counties. (c)   "Consideration" means in the case of any deed, the actual amount of money and the monetary value of any other thing of value constituting the entire compensation paid or to be paid for the transfer of title to the lands, tenements or other realty, including the remaining amount of any prior mortgage to which the transfer is subject or which is to be assumed and agreed to be paid by the grantee and any other lien or encumbrance thereon not paid, satisfied or removed in connection with the transfer of title.  The amount of liens for real property taxes, water or sewerage charges for the current or any subsequent year, or by way of added assessment or other adjustment, as well as of other like liens or encumbrances of a current and continuing nature ordinarily adjusted between the parties according to the period of ownership shall be excluded as an element in determining the consideration, notwithstanding that such amount is to be paid by the grantee. In the case of a leasehold interest for 99 years or more as defined in subsection (a) of this section, the consideration shall be in the amount of the assessed value of the property at the date of the transaction for the purpose of levying local real property taxes adjusted to reflect the true value in accordance with the county percentage level established for the current year. In the case of a proprietary lease of a cooperative unit or assignment thereof as defined in subsection (a) of this section, the consideration is the total price paid for the ownership interest held in conjunction with a cooperative unit, including the pro rata amount of any underlying mortgage or other obligation of the cooperative. (d)  "Blind person" means a person whose vision in his better eye with proper correction does not exceed 20/200 as measured by the Snellen chart or a person who has a field defect in his better eye with proper correction in which the peripheral field has contracted to such an extent that the widest diameter of visual field subtends an angular distance no greater than 20ø. (e)   "Disabled person" means any resident of this State who is permanently and totally disabled, unable to engage in gainful employment, and receiving disability benefits or any other compensation under any federal or State law. (f)   "Senior citizen" means any resident of this State of the age of 62 years or over. (g)  "New construction" means any conveyance or transfer of property upon which there is an entirely new improvement not previously occupied or used for any purpose. (h)  "Low and moderate income housing" means any residential premises, or part thereof, affordable according to federal Department of Housing and Urban Development or other recognized standards for home ownership and rental costs and occupied or reserved for occupancy by households with a gross income equal to 80% or less of the median gross household income for households of the same size within the housing region in which the housing is located, but shall include only those residential premises subject to resale controls pursuant to contractual guarantees. (i)   "Basic fee" means the fee established by paragraph (1) of subsection a. of section 3 of P.L.1968, c.49 (C.46:15-7), which fee shall consist of a State portion and a county portion as prescribed under that paragraph. (j)   "Additional fee" means the fee established by paragraph (2) of subsection a. of section 3 of P.L.1968, c.49. (k)  ["General purpose fee" means the fee established by paragraph (3) of subsection a. of section 3 of P.L.1968, c.49.] (Deleted by amendment, P.L.    , c.   ) (pending before the Legislature as this bill) (l)   "Supplemental fee" means the fee established by subsection a. of section 2 of P.L.2003, c.113 (C.46:15-7.1). (cf: P.L.2004, c.66, s.1) 3.    Section 3 of P.L.1968, c.49 (C.46:15-7) is amended to read as follows: 3.    a.   In addition to the recording fees imposed by section 2 of P.L.1965, c.123 (C.22A:4-4.1), a grantor shall pay to the county recording officer at the time the deed is offered for recording the following fees: (1)  A basic fee, which basic fee shall consist of (a) a State portion at the rate of $1.25 for each $500.00 of consideration or fractional part thereof recited in the deed, and (b) a county portion at the rate of $0.50 for each $500.00 of consideration or fractional part thereof so recited; provided however, that on and after the tenth day following a certification by the Director of the Division of Budget and Accounting in the Department of the Treasury pursuant to subsection b. of section 2 of P.L.1992, c.148 (C.46:15-10.2) [or subsubparagraph (ii) of subparagraph (b) of paragraph (2) of subsection b. of section 1 of P.L.1992, c.148 (C.13:19-16.1) as amended], the State portion of the basic fee shall not be imposed; and (2)  An additional fee at the rate of $0.75 for each $500.00 of consideration or fractional part thereof recited in the deed in excess of $150,000.00; provided however, that on and after the tenth day following a certification by the Director of the Division of Budget and Accounting in the Department of the Treasury pursuant to subsection b. of section 2 of P.L.1992, c.148 (C.46:15-10.2) [or subsubparagraph (ii) of subparagraph (b) of paragraph (2) of subsection b. of section 1 of P.L.1992, c.148 (C.13:19-16.1) as amended], the additional fee shall not be imposed[; and]. (3)  [A general purpose fee at the rate of: (a)   $0.90 for each $500.00 of consideration or fractional part thereof recited in the deed that is not in excess of $550,000.00, except that in the case of a conveyance or transfer of property for which the total consideration recited in the deed does not exceed $350,000.00, no general purpose fee shall be imposed; (b)  $1.40 for each $500.00 of consideration or fractional part thereof in excess of $550,000.00 but not in excess of $850,000.00 recited in the deed; (c)   $1.90 for each $500.00 of consideration or fractional part thereof in excess of $850,000.00 but not in excess of $1,000,000.00 recited in the deed; and (d)  $2.15 for each $500.00 of consideration or fractional part thereof in excess of $1,000,000.00 recited in the deed.] (Deleted by amendment, P.L.    , c.   ) (pending before the Legislature as this bill) b.    A deed subject to any of the fees established by this section, which is in fact recorded, shall be deemed to have been entitled to recording, notwithstanding that the amount of the consideration shall have been incorrectly stated or that the correct amount of such fee shall not have been paid.  No such defect shall in any way affect or impair the validity of the title conveyed or render the same unmarketable; but the person or persons required to pay said additional fee at the time of recording shall be and remain liable to the county recording officer for the payment of the proper amount thereof. (cf: P.L.2008, c.31, s.2) 4.    Section 4 of P.L.1968, c.49 (C.46:15-8) is amended to read as follows: 4.    a.  The proceeds of the fees collected by the county recording officer, as authorized by P.L.1968, c.49 (C.46:15-5 et seq.), shall be accounted for and remitted to the county treasurer. b.    (1) The county portion of the basic fee collected pursuant to paragraph (1) of subsection a. of section 3 of P.L.1968, c.49 (C.46:15-7) shall be retained by the county treasurer for the use of the county. (2) The State portion of the basic fee [,] and the additional fee [, and the general purpose fee] shall be paid to the State Treasurer for the use of the State.  Payments shall be made to the State Treasurer on the tenth day of each month following the month of collection. c.    (1) Amounts, not in excess of $25,000,000, paid during the State fiscal year to the State Treasurer from the payment of the State portion of the basic fee shall be credited to the "Shore Protection Fund" created pursuant to section 1 of P.L.1992, c.148 (C.13:19-16.1), in the manner established under that section. (2)  In addition to the amounts credited to the "Shore Protection Fund" pursuant to paragraph (1) of this subsection, amounts equal to $12,000,000 in each of the first 10 years after the date of enactment of the "Highlands Water Protection and Planning Act," P.L.2004, c.120 (C.13:20-1 et al.) and to $5,000,000 in each year thereafter, paid during the State fiscal year to the State Treasurer from the payment of fees collected by the county recording officer other than the additional fee of $0.75 for each $500 of consideration or fractional part thereof recited in the deed in excess of  $150,000 shall be credited to the "Highlands Protection Fund" created pursuant to section 21 of P.L.2004, c.120 (C.13:20-19), in the manner established under that section.  No monies shall be credited to the "Highlands Protection Fund" pursuant to this paragraph until and unless the full amount of $25,000,000 has first been credited to the "Shore Protection Fund" pursuant to paragraph (1) of this subsection. (3) In addition to the amounts credited pursuant to paragraphs (1) and (2) of this subsection, commencing with the first State fiscal year next following the enactment of P.L.2021, c.126, an amount equal to $20,000,000 shall annually be credited to the Special Needs Housing Trust Fund, created pursuant to section 1 of P.L.2005, c.163 (C.34:1B-21.25a), in the manner established under that section. d.    All amounts paid to the State Treasurer from the payment of the additional fee  shall be credited to the [Neighborhood Preservation Nonlapsing Revolving] New Jersey Affordable Housing Trust Fund established pursuant to P.L.1985, c.222 (C.52:27D-301 et al.), in the manner established under section 20 thereof (C.52:27D-320). (cf:  P.L.2021, c.126, s.1) 5.    Section 8 of P.L.2004, c.66 (C.46:15-7.2) is amended to read as follows: 8.    a.  In addition to all other fees imposed under P.L.1968, c.49 (C.46:15-5 et seq.), there is imposed a fee upon the grantee of a deed for the transfer of real property: (1)  [that is classified pursuant to the requirements of N.J.A.C.18:12-2.2 as Class 2 "residential";] (Deleted by amendment, P.L.    , c.   ) (pending before the Legislature as this bill) (2)  [(a)     that includes property classified pursuant to the requirements of N.J.A.C.18:12-2.2 as Class 3A: "farm property (regular)" but only if the property includes a building or structure intended or suited for residential use, and (b)  any other real property, regardless of class, that is effectively transferred to the same grantee in conjunction with the property described in subparagraph (a) of this paragraph;] (Deleted by amendment, P.L.    , c.   ) (pending before the Legislature as this bill) (3)  [that is a cooperative unit as defined in section 3 of P.L.1987, c.381 (C.46:8D-3); or] (Deleted by amendment, P.L.    , c.   ) (pending before the Legislature as this bill) (4)  that is classified pursuant to the requirements of N.J.A.C.18:12-2.2 as Class 4A "commercial properties" that is transferred for consideration in excess of $1,000,000 recited in the deed, which fee shall be an amount equal to 1 percent of the entire amount of such consideration, which fee shall be collected by the county recording officer at the time the deed is offered for recording and remitted to the State Treasurer not later than the 10th day of the month following the month of collection for deposit into the General Fund. b.    (1) The fee imposed by subsection a. of this section shall not apply to a deed if the grantee of the deed for the transfer of real property is an organization determined by the federal Internal Revenue Service to be exempt from federal income taxation pursuant to paragraph (3) of subsection (c) of section 501 of the federal Internal Revenue Code of 1986, 26 U.S.C. s.501. (2)  The fee imposed by subsection a. of this section shall not apply to a deed if the transfer of real property is incidental to a corporate merger or acquisition and the equalized assessed value of the real property transferred is less than 20% of the total value of all assets exchanged in the merger or acquisition.  A grantee shall claim this exemption from imposition of the fee at the time the deed is offered for recording by filing with the county recording officer such information, in addition to the affidavit of consideration filed by one or more of the grantee parties named in the deed or by the grantee's legal representative pursuant to subsection d. of this section, as the Director of the Division of Taxation in the Department of the Treasury may prescribe as to constitute a filing of a protest of the assessment of the fee and by paying any other recording fees not exempted pursuant to this paragraph.  This additional information shall be forwarded by the county recording officer to the director along with the grantee's affidavit of consideration, and shall be deemed to be and have the effect of a protest of a finding by the director of a deficiency of payment of the fee filed on the date on which the deed is recorded. (3)  The fee imposed by subsection a. of this section shall not apply to a deed if the transfer of real property is entered into on or after January 1, 2021 and is an intercompany transfer between combined group members as part of the unitary business, as those terms are used in section 4 of P.L.1945, c.162 (C.54:10A-4). c.   The fee imposed by subsection a. of this section shall be subject to the provisions of the State Uniform Tax Procedure Law, R.S.54:48-1 et seq.; provided however, that notwithstanding the provisions of subsection a. of R.S.54:49-14, a taxpayer may file a claim under oath for refund at any time within 90 days after the payment of any original fee and that subsection b. of R.S.54:49-14 shall not apply to any additional fee assessed. d.   (1) If a transfer includes property classified pursuant to the requirements of N.J.A.C.18:12-2.2 as Class 4 property of any type, an affidavit of consideration shall be filed by one or more of the grantor parties named in the deed or by the grantor's legal representative declaring the consideration and shall be annexed to and recorded with the deed as a prerequisite for the recording of the deed. The filing of an affidavit of consideration pursuant to this paragraph shall be in addition to the filing, if any, pursuant to paragraph (2) of this subsection. (2)  Whether or not the transfer is exempt, pursuant to subsection b. of this section or any other provision of law, from payment of the fee pursuant to subsection a. of this section, if a transfer includes property otherwise subject to subsection a. of this section, then an affidavit of consideration shall be filed by one or more of the grantee parties named in the deed or by the grantee's legal representative declaring the consideration and shall be annexed to and recorded with the deed as a prerequisite for the recording of the deed.  The filing of an affidavit of consideration pursuant to this paragraph shall be in addition to the filing, if any, pursuant to paragraph (1) of this subsection. (3)  An affidavit of consideration filed pursuant to paragraph (1) or paragraph (2) of this subsection shall clearly and entirely state the consideration, the county and municipality in which the property is situate, and the block and lot description of the real property conveyed. (4)  One copy of each affidavit of consideration filed and recorded with deeds pursuant to this subsection shall be forwarded by the county recording officer to the Director of the Division of Taxation in the Department of the Treasury on the tenth day of the month following the month of the filing of the deed. (cf: P.L.2020, c.118, s.2) 6.    This act shall take effect immediately and shall apply to transfers of real property occurring on or after the first day of the second calendar month following the date of enactment.